West Virginia, session 2026, SB151.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. APPLICATION FOR AND GRANTING OF ASSISTANCE. §9-3-7.  Medicaid eligibility calculations. The first $25,000 of the cash value of a life insurance policy shall be exempt from Medicaid eligibility calculations. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home